Hawaii statutes.
§125C-8 Personnel; delegation of
powers. The governor may appoint or employ temporary boards, agencies,
officers, employees, and other persons, or any of them, for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this chapter. All such temporarily appointed or
employed officers and employees, whether or not employed by contract, shall be
exempt from and not subject to nor entitled to the benefits of the provisions
of chapters 76 and 88, or any other law, collective bargaining agreement,
executive order, executive directive, or rule that is inapplicable to temporary
employees of the State. [L 1975, c 38, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 148, §14]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next